Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
Article 13 Licensing of Mortgage Lenders and Mortgage Brokers
7-1-1002.
Transaction of business without a license, registration, or exemption prohibited; knowing purchase of mortgage loan from unlicensed or nonexempt broker or lender prohibited; liability of persons controlling violators.

It shall be prohibited for any person to transact business in this state directly or indirectly as a mortgage broker, a mortgage lender, or a mortgage loan originator unless such person:

Is licensed or registered as such by the department utilizing the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry;

Is exempted from the licensing or registration requirements pursuant to Code Section 7-1-1001;

In the case of an employee of a mortgage broker or mortgage lender, has qualified to be relieved of the necessity for a license under the employee exemption in paragraph (14) of subsection (a) of Code Section 7-1-1001; or

In the case of a mortgage loan originator, is supervised by a mortgage broker, mortgage lender, or exemptee on a daily basis while performing mortgage functions; is employed by and works exclusively for only one mortgage broker, mortgage lender, or exemptee; and is paid on a W-2 basis by the employing mortgage broker, mortgage lender, or exemptee, except those natural persons exempt from licensure as a mortgage broker or mortgage lender under paragraph (17) of subsection (a) of Code Section 7-1-1001. Each licensed mortgage loan originator shall register with and maintain a valid unique identifier issued by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry. For the purposes of implementing an orderly and efficient mortgage loan originator process, the department may establish licensing rules or regulations and interim procedures for licensing and acceptance of applications.

(a.1)

A loan processor or underwriter who is an independent contractor shall not engage in the activities of a loan processor or underwriter unless such independent contractor loan processor or underwriter obtains and maintains a mortgage broker or mortgage lender license. Each independent contractor loan processor or underwriter licensed as a mortgage broker or mortgage lender shall have and maintain a valid unique identifier issued by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.

It shall be prohibited for any person, as defined in Code Section 7-1-1000, to purchase, sell, or transfer one or more mortgage loans or loan applications from or to a mortgage loan originator, mortgage broker, or mortgage lender who is neither licensed nor exempt from the licensing or registration provisions of this article. Such a purchase shall not affect the obligation of the borrower under the terms of the mortgage loan. The department shall provide for distribution or availability of information regarding approved or revoked licenses.

Every person who directly or indirectly controls a person who violates subsection (a), (a.1), or (b) of this Code section, every general partner, executive officer, joint venturer, or director of such person, and every person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions as such person violates with and to the same extent as such person, unless the person whose violation arises under this subsection sustains the burden of proof that he or she did not know and, in the exercise of reasonable care, could not have known of the existence of the facts by reason of which the original violation is alleged to exist.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-1002

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 543, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, § 33; Ga. L. 1996, p. 848, § 15; Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, § 28; Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 24; Ga. L. 2003, p. 843, § 17; Ga. L. 2009, p. 252, § 1/HB 312; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 7/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2011, p. 518, § 9/HB 239; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 7/HB 90; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 6-1/HB 811; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 7/HB 323; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” for “Nation-wide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” in paragraph (a)(1), in the second sentence of paragraph (a)(4), and in the last sentence of subsection (a.1).

7-1-1003.
Applications for licenses.

An application for a license under this article shall be made in writing, under oath, and in such form as the department may prescribe. Each such form shall contain content as set forth by rule, regulation, instruction, or procedure of the department and may be changed or updated as necessary by the department in order to carry out the purposes of this article. The department, by regulation, may prescribe different classes of licenses for mortgage loan originators, mortgage brokers, and mortgage lenders.

The application shall include the following:

The legal name and address of the applicant and, if the applicant is a partnership, association, corporation, or other business entity, of every member, officer, and director thereof;

All names, including, but not limited to, website domain names (URLs), under which the applicant will conduct business in Georgia;

For mortgage brokers and mortgage lenders, the address of the main office or principal place of business where books and records are located and any other locations at which the applicant will engage in any business activity covered by the provisions of this article, together with the mailing address where the department shall send all correspondence, orders, or notices. Any changes in this mailing address shall be delivered in writing to the department before the change is effective;

For mortgage brokers and mortgage lenders, the complete name and address of the applicant’s initial registered agent and registered office for service of process in Georgia. If the applicant is a Georgia corporation, this registered agent shall be the same as the agent recorded with the Secretary of State. Any changes in the registered agent or registered office shall be delivered in writing to the department and the Secretary of State, if applicable, before the change is effective. The registered agent may, but is not required to, be an officer of the applicant, and the registered office shall be a Georgia location where the registered agent may be served;

For mortgage brokers and mortgage lenders, the general plan and character of the business;

For mortgage brokers and mortgage lenders, a financial statement of the applicant;

For mortgage brokers and mortgage lenders, such other data, financial statements, and pertinent information as the department may require with respect to the applicant, its directors, trustees, officers, members, agents, or ultimate equitable owners of 10 percent or more of the applicant; and

For mortgage brokers and mortgage loan originators, evidence of satisfaction of experience or education requirements, as required by regulations of the department.

All applications filed under this Code section shall be filed together with:

Investigation and supervision fees established by regulation;

The items required by Code Section 7-1-1003.2; and

Other information as may be required by the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-1003

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 543, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 570, § 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 848, § 16; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 31; Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 25; Ga. L. 2001, p. 970, § 10; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 30/SB 82; Ga. L. 2009, p. 252, § 1/HB 312; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 33/HB 184.

7-1-1003.1.
[Reserved] Physical place of business.

History.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 590, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 32; Ga. L. 2009, p. 252, § 1/HB 312; repealed by Ga. L. 2020, p. 320, § 18/HB 781, effective January 1, 2021.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2020, p. 320, § 18/HB 781 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective January 1, 2021.

7-1-1003.2.
Financial requirements for licensing and registration; bond requirements.

Each licensed or registered mortgage broker shall provide the department with a bond. The bond for a mortgage broker shall be in the principal sum of $150,000.00 or such greater sum as the department may require as set forth by regulation based on an amount that reflects the dollar amount of loans originated, and the bond shall meet the other requirements of subsection (d) of this Code section.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this Code section, the department shall not license or register any mortgage lender unless the applicant or registrant provides the department with a bond. The bond for a mortgage lender shall be in the principal sum of $250,000.00 or such greater sum as the department may require as set forth by regulation based on an amount that reflects the dollar amount of loans originated, and which bond shall meet the other requirements of subsection (d) of this Code section.

Each mortgage loan originator shall be covered by the surety bond of his or her sponsoring licensed or registered mortgage broker or lender. In the event that the mortgage loan originator is an employee of a licensed or registered mortgage broker or lender or under an exclusive written independent contractor agreement as described in paragraph (17) of Code Section 7-1-1001, the surety bond of such licensed or registered mortgage broker or lender may be used in lieu of the mortgage loan originator’s surety bond requirement.

General bond requirements:

The bond requirements for mortgage loan originators, mortgage brokers, and mortgage lenders are continuous in nature and shall be maintained at all times as a condition of licensure;

The corporate surety bond shall be for a term and in a form satisfactory to the department, shall be issued by a bonding company or insurance company authorized to do business in this state and approved by the department, and shall run to the State of Georgia for the benefit of any person damaged by noncompliance of a licensee with this article, the “Georgia Residential Mortgage Act,” or with any condition of such bond. Damages under the bond shall include moneys owed to the department for fees, fines, or penalties. Such bond shall be continuously maintained thereafter in full force. Such bond shall be conditioned upon the applicant or the licensee conducting his or her licensed business in conformity with this article and all applicable laws;

When an action is commenced on a licensee’s bond, the department may require the filing of a new bond; and

Immediately upon recovery upon any action on the bond, the licensee shall file a new bond.

Any person including the department who may be damaged by noncompliance of a licensee with any condition of a bond or this article, the “Georgia Residential Mortgage Act,” may proceed on such bond against the principal or surety thereon, or both, to recover damages.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-1003.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 26; Ga. L. 2001, p. 970, § 11; Ga. L. 2003, p. 843, § 18; Ga. L. 2004, p. 458, § 11; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 31/SB 82; Ga. L. 2009, p. 252, § 1/HB 312; Ga. L. 2011, p. 518, § 10/HB 239; Ga. L. 2017, p. 193, § 24/HB 143.

Law reviews.

For article, “Business Associations,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 109 (2001).

7-1-1003.3.
Application for registration.

An application to register as a mortgage lender or broker under this article shall be made annually in writing, under oath, on a form provided by the department, subject to requirements specified by rules and regulations of the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-1003.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 26; Ga. L. 2004, p. 458, § 12; Ga. L. 2009, p. 252, § 1/HB 312.

7-1-1003.4.
[Reserved] Notification statement.

History.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 26; repealed by Ga. L. 2009, p. 252, § 1/HB 312, effective July 1, 2009.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 252, § 1/HB 312 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2009.

7-1-1003.5.
Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.

The department is authorized to:

Participate in the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry in order to facilitate the sharing of information and standardization of the licensing and application processes for mortgage loan originators, mortgage brokers, and mortgage lenders by electronic or other means;

Enter into operating agreements, information sharing agreements, interstate cooperative agreements, and other contracts necessary for the department’s participation in the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry;

Request that the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry adopt an appropriate privacy, data security, and security breach notification policy that is in full compliance with existing state and federal law;

Disclose or cause to be disclosed without liability via the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry applicant and licensee information, including, but not limited to, violations of this article and enforcement actions to facilitate regulatory oversight of mortgage loan originators, mortgage brokers, and mortgage lenders across state jurisdictional lines;

Establish and adopt, by rule or regulation, requirements for participation by applicants and licensees in the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry upon the department’s determination that each new or amended requirement is consistent with both the public interest and the purposes of this article; and

Pay all fees received from licensees and applicants related to applications, licenses, and renewals to the Office of the State Treasurer; provided, however, that the department may net such fees to recover the cost of participation in the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.

Irrespective of its participation in the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, the department retains full and exclusive authority over determinations whether to grant, renew, suspend, or revoke licenses issued to mortgage loan originators, mortgage brokers, and mortgage lenders under this article. Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to reduce this authority.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-1003.5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 539, § 1/HB 921; Ga. L. 2009, p. 252, § 1/HB 312; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 2/SB 296; Ga. L. 2011, p. 518, § 11/HB 239; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 7/HB 942; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 6-1/HB 811; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” for “Nation-wide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” throughout this Code section.

7-1-1003.6.
Privileged or confidential nature of information; exception.

Except as otherwise provided in the federal Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act of 2008, the requirements under any federal law or Georgia state law regarding the privacy or confidentiality of any information or material provided to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry and any privilege arising under federal or state law, including the rules of any federal or state court, with respect to such information or material, shall continue to apply to such information or material after the information or material has been disclosed to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry. Such information and material may be shared with all state and federal regulatory agencies or law enforcement authorities without the loss of privilege or the loss of confidentiality protection provided by federal or state law.

Information or material that is subject to privilege or confidentiality under subsection (a) of this Code section shall not be subject to:

Disclosure under any federal or state law governing the disclosure to the public of information held by an officer or an agency of the federal government or the respective state; or

Subpoena or discovery, or admission into evidence, in any private civil action unless with respect to any privilege held by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry regarding such information or material, the person to whom such information or material pertains waives, in whole or in part, in the discretion of such person that privilege.

This Code section shall not apply with respect to the information or material relating to the employment history of, and publicly adjudicated disciplinary and enforcement actions against, licensees that are included in the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry for access by the public.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-1003.6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 252, § 1/HB 312; Ga. L. 2011, p. 518, § 12/HB 239; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 6-1/HB 811; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” for “Nation-wide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” twice in subsection (a), in paragraph (b)(2), and in subsection (c).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, in subsection (a), “confidentiality” was substituted for “confidentially” in the first sentence, and in subsection (b), “to privilege or confidentiality” was substituted for “to a privilege or confidentially” in the introductory language.

7-1-1003.7.
Approval of mortgage industry related courses; application; renewal applications; audits.

Any education provider which offers mortgage industry related courses designed to satisfy education requirements as provided in subsection (c) of Code Section 7-1-1004 and associated department rules shall be approved by the department.

An application under this Code section shall be made in writing, under oath, and in such form as the department may prescribe. The application shall include the following:

The name and address of the applicant and, if the entity is not a sole proprietorship, the name of every member, officer, principal, or director thereof;

The name under which the applicant will conduct business in Georgia;

A proposed certificate program or course of study which lists each subject to be taught and credit or classroom hours for each course designed to satisfy education requirements;

Qualifications and credentials of any and all instructors teaching courses named in paragraph (3) of this subsection; and

Other information as may be required by the department.

The initial application shall be filed with the department along with fees established by rule, no portion of which shall be refunded or prorated. Upon receipt of an application, the department shall conduct such investigation as it deems necessary to determine that the applicant and the individuals who direct the affairs or establish policy for the applicant, including the officers, directors, or the equivalent, are of good character and ethical reputation; that the applicant and such persons meet the requirements of subsection (h) of Code Section 7-1-1004; that the applicant and such persons demonstrate reasonable financial responsibility; that the applicant has and maintains a registered agent for service in this state; and that the applicant and such persons are qualified by education and experience to present courses directly related to the mortgage brokering process.

All education providers approved under this Code section shall be required to file a renewal application on an annual basis in writing, under oath, and in such a form as the department may prescribe. A fee established by the department shall be paid with each renewal application, which fee shall not be refunded or prorated. Failure to file a renewal application shall result in the education provider being removed from the department list of approved mortgage education providers.

The department may audit or investigate course offerings of the applicant or approved mortgage education provider as it deems necessary and without cost to the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-1003.7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 252, § 1/HB 312; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 7/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2011, p. 518, § 13/HB 239.